Colorado, session 2026A, HB1008.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Short title. The short title of this act is the "Colorado
Outdoor Opportunities Act".
SECTION 2. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(a) It is the policy of the state of Colorado that the state's
unparalleled landscapes, wildlife, public lands, and outdoor experiences be
protected, conserved, and enhanced for the benefit and enjoyment of current
and future generations, while protecting the state's agricultural heritage and
private property rights;
(b) Outdoor recreation, access to quality outdoor experiences, and
the conservation of lands and wildlife habitats, all within the context of a
changing climate and growing population, are vital components in ensuring
a thriving future for Colorado's outdoors;
(c) Outdoor recreation is fundamental to Colorado's economy,
culture, and identity, contributing to public health, community well-being,
and the development of lifelong connections to the outdoors. Outdoor
recreation annually contributes $65.8 billion to Colorado's economy and
supports 404,000 jobs, over 12% of the entire labor force in Colorado.
(d) Outdoor recreation's significant economic, fiscal, and community
benefits across the state include revenue that supports public services,
infrastructure, and investments, from transportation to child care and mental
health services, that contribute to the health, safety, and welfare of
Coloradans. It is important that these benefits be equitably distributed
throughout the state to the extent possible.
(e) Ensuring safe, high-quality outdoor experiences through
purposeful planning, coordination, and management is essential to
sustaining the state's outdoor heritage;
(f) Connecting youth to outdoor experiences is vital for ensuring the
long-term well-being of the state's residents, since research demonstrates
that outdoor engagement supports improved cognitive abilities, fosters
creativity and resilience, and is essential for promoting public health and
reducing stress, and many communities face barriers to accessing the
outdoors and the benefits of spending time in nature;
(g) Colorado's outdoors face significant and urgent pressures from
growing populations, human disturbance, and development, alongside
severe climate-driven impacts such as wildfires, drought, and rising
temperatures. It is essential that the state play an active role in appropriately
managing these pressures to ensure Colorado's outdoors are available for
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1008

future generations.
(h) Thoughtful planning and management of outdoor recreation and
associated infrastructure should consider economic, fiscal, and
service-related impacts on local communities and regions and can support
conservation goals by reducing resource impacts, improving stewardship,
and sustaining the long-term health of the state's public lands;
(i) Colorado has a long-standing tradition of managing public lands
and working landscapes to support a range of compatible uses and affirms
that coordinated outdoor recreation management can occur alongside
conservation, agricultural operations, and other land uses in ways that
support long-term resource stewardship and community values;
(j) As more visitors and Coloradans participate in all forms of
outdoor recreation, it is important to advance exceptional recreation
experiences that are accessible, inclusive, and sustainable so that future
generations may continue to enjoy the state's world-class outdoor
opportunities;
(k) To effectively manage these challenges, the state must formalize
and strengthen collaboration across conservation, wildlife, agriculture, and
recreation partners, local governments, Tribal governments, and federal
land managers, including by soliciting rural perspectives; develop shared
tools and data; advance coordinated planning that recognizes that
Colorado's public and private lands support multiple uses; and align funding
to support voluntary, strategic actions that sustain high-quality recreation
opportunities while maintaining resilient landscapes, wildlife habitat,
working lands, and community values for all Coloradans;
(l) Colorado's outdoors strategy, developed by the department of
natural resources, the division of parks and wildlife, great outdoors
Colorado, the office of climate preparedness in the governor's office, and
the outdoor recreation industry office in the office of economic
development, in collaboration with partners and stakeholders, provides the
necessary statewide vision and coordination to advance conservation,
climate resilience, and outdoor recreation opportunities. One strength of
Colorado's outdoors strategy is its voluntary approach that allows partners
to leverage opportunities that support locally determined needs.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1008

(m) The general assembly recognizes the role that the Colorado
outdoor regional partnerships initiative, created by the governor's executive
order B 2020 008, plays in convening vital perspectives, partners, and
expertise in land conservation, land use, and recreation planning. The
initiative is a locally driven and powerful platform for early and proactive
coordination among stakeholders, helping to identify shared priorities,
reduce conflict, and advance tangible outcomes for outdoor recreation and
conservation statewide. It is the intent of the general assembly that the
initiative remains a voluntary and locally derived process with opportunities
for stakeholder engagement, including county governments.
(n) The division of parks and wildlife engages and will continue to
engage in formal consultation with Tribal governments, including the
Southern Ute Indian Tribe and Ute Mountain Ute Tribe, which are the two
federally recognized tribes with reservations in Colorado, when the division
is requested to do so and when issues of importance to Tribal governments
arise, which issues concern outdoor recreation or division actions on state
public lands that may affect Tribal sovereignty or treaty rights of the Tribal
governments in Colorado, including history, culture, and natural and
cultural resources;
(o) Meaningful engagement with tribal nations is important, and the
collaborative framework developed in Colorado's outdoors strategy is
crucial to support ongoing tribal participation in statewide outdoor
recreation and conservation efforts;
(p) The outdoor recreation industry office plays a vital role in
advancing outdoor recreation. The mission of the office is to champion
industry, communities, and people through Colorado's great outdoors. The
office is a vital partner for the division of parks and wildlife in coordinating
outdoor recreation industry partnerships and supporting the division in
planning and outcomes for the advancement of exceptional and sustainable
outdoor recreation opportunities.
(q) Local governments are critical partners in outdoor recreation
planning, coordination, and management, and recreation impacts
communities in different ways. The rapid increase in demand for outdoor
recreation is challenging local governments' ability to maintain access and
provide related services. For example, counties and municipalities
frequently experience increased and unique demands related to outdoor
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1008

recreation, including emergency services. Counties are well suited to
convene area partners and play a critical role in identifying and addressing
localized impacts of recreation, and state coordination should incorporate
local perspectives to reduce unintended burdens on community
infrastructure and services. It is essential that the state work in partnership
with local governments to manage these impacts and advance locally driven
visions for outdoor recreation.
(r) With approximately 60% of Colorado land in private ownership,
working with private landowners is also essential to the success of
Colorado's outdoors strategy, and it is important to ensure that agricultural
interests, private landowners, including private landowners adjacent to
outdoor recreation development, and local governments are integrally
involved in state efforts; wildlife habitats are protected; and private property
rights are upheld as conservation and recreation management decisions are
made;
(s) The division of parks and wildlife possesses a long history of
outdoor recreation planning, management, and recreational asset delivery
through its state parks system, which serves as a significant source of
exceptional and accessible outdoor recreation opportunities. The division's
responsibilities extend beyond state park boundaries and encompass outdoor
recreation coordination, wildlife conservation, and support for partners
managing lands across all jurisdictions. As a leader in outdoor recreation
management, the division is well-positioned to play a critical coordinating
role in advancing outdoor recreation planning and management statewide,
beyond the boundaries of its current 43 state parks. It is the intent of the
general assembly to formalize the division's role in meeting these
responsibilities, without diminishing the division's long-standing
responsibilities.
(t) The division of parks and wildlife assumes lead responsibility as
the state's coordinating entity for advancing implementation of Colorado's
outdoors strategy, in partnership with the department of natural resources,
great outdoors Colorado, the outdoor recreation industry office, the office
of climate preparedness, and other state and local government partners. In
this role, the division facilitates early and proactive coordination and
planning among agencies and stakeholders to reduce conflict, improve
efficiency, and ensure accountability in advancing its goals and vision to
find mutually beneficial outcomes that support and maintain Colorado's
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1008

world-class outdoor recreation and natural resources.
(2) The general assembly further finds the need to expand and
strengthen the division of parks and wildlife's capacity for the coordination,
planning, development, and management of Colorado's outdoor recreation
to ensure the state's recreation opportunities provide high-quality visitor
experiences that are responsibly managed to align natural resources,
wildlife, agricultural heritage, private property, and public safety. The
general assembly further recognizes that 36% of Colorado is federal public
land and a significant amount of recreation in Colorado occurs on federal
public lands; therefore, there is a growing need for the division to support
recreation management and stewardship on federal public lands, which
necessitates increased staff capacity and enhanced coordination with federal
land management agencies, without expenditures from the wildlife cash
fund created in section 33-1-112 (1)(a), Colorado Revised Statutes.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 33-10-102, add (1.5),
(2.5), (2.7), (2.9), (7.5), (10.5), and (13.5) as follows:
33-10-102. Definitions.
As used in articles 10 to 15 of this title 33, unless the context
otherwise requires:
(1.5) "ACCESSIBLE EXPERIENCES" MEANS OUTDOOR RECREATION
OPPORTUNITIES THAT LOWER BARRIERS TO PARTICIPATION AND ENJOYMENT,
SUCH AS BY MEETING THE NEEDS OF DISPROPORTIONATELY IMPACTED
COMMUNITIES, GEOGRAPHICALLY DIVERSE OR UNDERREPRESENTED
COMMUNITIES, OR PEOPLE EXPERIENCING DISABILITIES, WITH THE GOAL OF
ENABLING EVERYONE TO EXPLORE THE OUTDOORS AND BE PART OF THE
LARGER COMMUNITY REGARDLESS OF MOBILITY OR OTHER LIMITATIONS.
(2.5) "COLORADO'S OUTDOORS STRATEGY" MEANS "COLORADO'S
OUTDOORS STRATEGY: A COLLABORATIVE VISION FOR CONSERVATION,
OUTDOOR RECREATION, AND CLIMATE RESILIENCE (2025)", PREPARED, IN
COLLABORATION WITH A BROAD RANGE OF PARTNERS, BY THE DEPARTMENT,
THE DIVISION, GREAT OUTDOORS COLORADO, THE OUTDOOR RECREATION
INDUSTRY OFFICE, THE OFFICE OF CLIMATE PREPAREDNESS, AND THE
GOVERNOR'S OFFICE, AND ANY SUBSEQUENT UPDATES.
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1008

(2.7) "COORDINATING PARTNERS" MEANS THE DEPARTMENT, GREAT
OUTDOORS COLORADO, THE OUTDOOR RECREATION INDUSTRY OFFICE, AND
THE OFFICE OF CLIMATE PREPAREDNESS.
(2.9) "EXCEPTIONAL AND SUSTAINABLE OUTDOOR RECREATION"
MEANS THE BROAD RANGE OF NATURE- AND PLACE-BASED EXPERIENCES
THAT ARE ENJOYED BY A DIVERSITY OF PEOPLE AND THAT PROVIDE
HIGH-QUALITY, INCLUSIVE, AND ACCESSIBLE EXPERIENCES FOR PRESENT AND
FUTURE GENERATIONS WHILE RESPECTING THE LONG-TERM ECOLOGICAL
INTEGRITY OF THE NATURAL RESOURCES, WILDLIFE POPULATIONS, WORKING
LANDS, AND COMMUNITIES UPON WHICH THOSE EXPERIENCES DEPEND.
(7.5) "GREAT OUTDOORS COLORADO" MEANS THE GREAT OUTDOORS
COLORADO PROGRAM ESTABLISHED BY ARTICLE XXVII OF THE STATE
CONSTITUTION AND IMPLEMENTED PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 60 OF THIS TITLE
33.
(10.5) "OFFICE OF CLIMATE PREPAREDNESS" MEANS THE OFFICE OF
CLIMATE PREPAREDNESS CREATED IN SECTION 24-38.8-102 (1).
(13.5) "OUTDOOR RECREATION INDUSTRY OFFICE" MEANS THE
OUTDOOR RECREATION INDUSTRY OFFICE CREATED IN SECTION 24-48.5-129.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 33-10-119 as
follows:
33-10-119. Parks and outdoor recreation capacity - outdoor
recreation coordination, planning, and management - duties of the
division - planning reports - legislative declaration.
(1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(a) IT IS IMPORTANT THAT THE DIVISION PERPETUATE THE WILDLIFE
RESOURCES OF THE STATE, PROVIDE A HIGH-QUALITY STATE PARKS SYSTEM,
AND PROVIDE ENJOYABLE AND SUSTAINABLE OUTDOOR RECREATION
OPPORTUNITIES THAT EDUCATE AND INSPIRE CURRENT AND FUTURE
GENERATIONS TO SERVE AS ACTIVE STEWARDS OF THE STATE'S NATURAL
RESOURCES;
(b) THE DIVISION, PURSUANT TO SECTION 33-9-101, PROVIDES A
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1008

COMPREHENSIVE PROGRAM DESIGNED TO OFFER THE GREATEST POSSIBLE
VARIETY OF EXCEPTIONAL AND SUSTAINABLE OUTDOOR RECREATION
OPPORTUNITIES TO STATE RESIDENTS AND VISITORS; AND
(c) THE DIVISION IS BEST POSITIONED TO SERVE AS THE STATE'S
COORDINATING ENTITY FOR ADVANCING IMPLEMENTATION OF COLORADO'S
OUTDOORS STRATEGY, IN COLLABORATION WITH COORDINATING PARTNERS
AND OTHER STATE, FEDERAL, AND LOCAL GOVERNMENT PARTNERS; TRIBAL
GOVERNMENTS; AND INTERESTED STAKEHOLDERS, INCLUDING LOCAL
COMMUNITIES, PRIVATE LANDOWNERS, RECREATION AND RECREATION
PROVIDER STAKEHOLDERS, CONSERVATION STAKEHOLDERS, AGRICULTURAL
STAKEHOLDERS, AND WILDLIFE AND SPORTSPERSON STAKEHOLDERS. IN THIS
ROLE, THE DIVISION SHOULD FACILITATE PLANNING AND DATA
COORDINATION AMONG PARTNERS AND STAKEHOLDERS TO SUPPORT
COORDINATION AND ACCOUNTABILITY IN ADVANCING THE STRATEGY'S
GOALS AND VISION.
(2) THE DIVISION SHALL DEVELOP AND MAINTAIN THE
ORGANIZATIONAL CAPACITY SUFFICIENT TO EFFECTIVELY EXECUTE THE
DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES DESCRIBED IN THIS SECTION.
(3) THE DIVISION SHALL:
(a) ENSURE THAT OUTDOOR RECREATION NEEDS ARE PRIORITIZED
AND REPRESENTED WITHIN THE LEADERSHIP OF THE DIVISION; AND
(b) DEVELOP THE CAPACITY OF THE DIVISION TO INCREASE
COORDINATION BETWEEN OUTDOOR RECREATION, WILDLIFE, AGRICULTURAL,
AND CLIMATE-RESILIENCE EFFORTS AND INTERAGENCY PLANNING AND
ACTIVITIES.
(4) IN IMPLEMENTING SUBSECTIONS (2) AND (3) OF THIS SECTION, THE
DIVISION SHALL FOCUS ON THE FOLLOWING GOALS:
(a) STRENGTHENING THE DIVISION'S CAPACITY FOR COORDINATED
RECREATION MANAGEMENT, PARTICULARLY AT THE REGIONAL LEVEL, TO
ANTICIPATE AND WORK THROUGH POTENTIAL CONFLICTS, BY COORDINATING
AND INCORPORATING WILDLIFE, CONSERVATION, RECREATION, AND
CLIMATE-RESILIENCE CONSIDERATIONS ACROSS DIVISION PLANNING AND
DECISION-MAKING AND IN ALIGNMENT WITH LOCAL PERSPECTIVES;
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1008

(b) PROACTIVELY ENGAGING WITH STATE, FEDERAL, AND LOCAL
GOVERNMENT PARTNERS; TRIBAL GOVERNMENTS; AND INTERESTED
STAKEHOLDERS, INCLUDING LOCAL COMMUNITIES, PRIVATE LANDOWNERS,
RECREATION AND RECREATION PROVIDER STAKEHOLDERS, CONSERVATION
STAKEHOLDERS, STAKEHOLDERS REPRESENTING A DISPROPORTIONATELY
IMPACTED COMMUNITY, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 24-4-109 (2)(b)(II),
AGRICULTURAL STAKEHOLDERS, AND WILDLIFE AND SPORTSPERSON
STAKEHOLDERS, TO ENSURE THAT ALL PERSPECTIVES AND AREAS OF
EXPERTISE ARE CONSIDERED IN THE DIVISION'S PLANNING AND MANAGEMENT
PROCESSES;
(c) ADVANCING AND FORMALIZING INTERNAL PROCESSES TO BETTER
INTEGRATE RECREATION OPPORTUNITIES AND RESOURCE MANAGEMENT INTO
THE DIVISION'S CORE OPERATIONS, ENSURING COORDINATION BETWEEN
RECREATION ACCESS, AGRICULTURAL WORKING LANDS, AND WILDLIFE AND
HABITAT STEWARDSHIP;
(d) COORDINATING AND BALANCING THE DIVISION'S PARTICIPATION
IN EXTERNAL PROCESSES, INCLUDING PUBLIC PLANNING, FEDERAL LAND
MANAGEMENT, AND LEGISLATIVE ENGAGEMENT, TO ENSURE THAT
RECREATION, WILDLIFE, CONSERVATION, AGRICULTURE, AND COMMUNITY
PRIORITIES ARE CONSISTENTLY REPRESENTED;
(e) COLLABORATING CLOSELY WITH COORDINATING PARTNERS TO
LEAD ENGAGEMENT WITH OTHER STATE AGENCIES TO ADVANCE A
COORDINATED AND UNIFIED APPROACH TO ENHANCING OUTDOOR
RECREATION OPPORTUNITIES, MANAGEMENT, AND PLANNING AT THE STATE
LEVEL;
(f) PROACTIVELY ENGAGING WITH TRIBAL GOVERNMENTS THROUGH
THE FRAMEWORK COLLABORATIVELY DEVELOPED IN COLORADO'S
OUTDOORS STRATEGY, ENSURING THAT TRIBAL PERSPECTIVES AND
PRIORITIES, TREATY RIGHTS, AND CULTURAL PRIORITIES ARE MEANINGFULLY
INCORPORATED INTO STATEWIDE PLANNING AND COORDINATION PROCESSES;
AND
(g) SERVING AS A CLEARINGHOUSE FOR INFORMATION ON
VOLUNTARY BEST PRACTICES, TOOLS, AND STRATEGIES, INCLUDING
THROUGH ADVANCEMENT OF THE COLORADO OUTDOORS STRATEGY
TOOLKIT, TO SUPPORT INTERDISCIPLINARY AND INCLUSIVE PLANNING
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1008

PROCESSES AT ALL LEVELS.
(5) CONSISTENT WITH THE MISSION AND DIRECTIVES OF THE DIVISION
OUTLINED IN THIS ARTICLE 10, AND AS THE STATE AGENCY WITH PRIMARY
COORDINATING RESPONSIBILITY FOR EXCEPTIONAL AND SUSTAINABLE
OUTDOOR RECREATION PLANNING, SUSTAINABLE VISITOR USE MANAGEMENT,
AND REGIONAL PARTNERSHIP COORDINATION, THE DIVISION SHALL:
(a) PROVIDE PROACTIVE APPROACHES TO VISITOR USE MANAGEMENT,
WHICH APPROACHES CONSIDER ON-THE-GROUND CAPACITY TO SUPPORT
VISITOR USE MANAGEMENT, MAINTENANCE, AND COORDINATION, TO FOSTER
OUTCOMES THAT SUPPORT IMPROVED OUTDOOR RECREATION OPPORTUNITIES
AND EXPERIENCES, NATURAL RESOURCE CONSERVATION, AND PROTECTION
OF WILDLIFE HABITATS AND WORKING LANDS;
(b) IN ALIGNMENT WITH COLORADO'S OUTDOORS STRATEGY,
SUPPORT THE PLANNING, DEVELOPMENT, AND MAINTENANCE OF OUTDOOR
RECREATION FACILITIES, INFRASTRUCTURE, AND ACCESS IMPROVEMENTS
STATEWIDE, WITH THE GOAL OF ENHANCING SUSTAINABLE AND
EXCEPTIONAL OUTDOOR OPPORTUNITIES WHILE PROTECTING PRIVATE
PROPERTY RIGHTS, AGRICULTURAL OPERATIONS ON WORKING LANDS,
WILDLIFE, AND NATURAL RESOURCES;
(c) COORDINATE AND CONSULT WITH LOCAL GOVERNMENTS TO
IDENTIFY POTENTIAL IMPACTS TO SERVICES AND INFRASTRUCTURE
ASSOCIATED WITH OUTDOOR RECREATION USE, INCLUDING OPPORTUNITIES
TO MITIGATE THESE IMPACTS, COMMUNICATE EXISTING FUNDING
OPPORTUNITIES AVAILABLE THROUGH THE DIVISION, AND GIVE APPROPRIATE
CONSIDERATION TO LOCAL GOVERNMENT PRIORITIES, JURISDICTIONAL
AUTHORITIES, AND REGIONAL PLANNING EFFORTS TO ENSURE A
COOPERATIVE AND COMPLEMENTARY APPROACH TO ACHIEVING OUTDOOR
RECREATION PLANNING AND MANAGEMENT; AND
(d) IN CARRYING OUT THE DUTIES DESCRIBED IN THIS SUBSECTION
(5), APPLY AN INTEGRATED APPROACH THAT CONSIDERS OUTDOOR
RECREATION ACCESS, VISITOR USE MANAGEMENT, CONSERVATION, WILDLIFE
HABITAT, WORKING LANDS, AND LONG-TERM RESOURCE STEWARDSHIP SO
THAT THESE USES, TAKEN TOGETHER, BEST MEET PRESENT AND FUTURE
NEEDS WITHOUT PERMANENT IMPAIRMENT OF THE PRODUCTIVITY OR HEALTH
OF THE STATE'S NATURAL RESOURCES, TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE AND
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1008

CONSISTENT WITH STATE LAW.
(6) CONSISTENT WITH THE DIVISION'S MISSION AND THE OBJECTIVES
OF COLORADO'S OUTDOORS STRATEGY, THE DIVISION SHALL WORK TO
ADVANCE SUSTAINABLE OUTDOOR RECREATION, WILDLIFE CONSERVATION,
AND CLIMATE RESILIENCE OUTCOMES THROUGH COLLABORATION, DATA
INTEGRATION, PROACTIVE PLANNING, STRATEGIC FINANCIAL INVESTMENT,
AND REPORTING. TO FULFILL ITS DUTIES RELATED TO STATEWIDE OUTDOOR
COORDINATION, THE DIVISION SHALL:
(a) LEAD AND COORDINATE ACROSS STATE, LOCAL, AND FEDERAL
GOVERNMENT PARTNERS AND TRIBAL GOVERNMENTS PARTICIPATING IN
REGIONAL OUTDOOR PARTNERSHIP PLANNING EFFORTS AND RELATED
VOLUNTARY EFFORTS ASSOCIATED WITH COLORADO'S OUTDOORS STRATEGY;
AND
(b) (I) DEVELOP AND MAINTAIN A RECURRING INTERNAL
COORDINATION AND REPORTING PROCESS, INCLUDING BY CREATING
PLANNING REPORTS, TO INTEGRATE DATA, PRIORITIES, AND OUTCOMES FROM
WILDLIFE, RECREATION, CLIMATE RESILIENCE, AND REGIONAL OUTDOOR
PARTNERSHIP EFFORTS, ENSURING ALIGNMENT WITH THE GOALS OF
COLORADO'S OUTDOORS STRATEGY AND OTHER DIVISION EFFORTS BOTH
REGIONALLY AND ACROSS THE DIVISION. IN CREATING PLANNING REPORTS,
THE DIVISION SHALL:
(A) INTEGRATE AND SUMMARIZE KEY METRICS, OUTCOMES,
OPPORTUNITIES, NEEDS, PERFORMANCE INDICATORS, AND ECONOMIC
IMPACTS AND BENEFITS FROM STATEWIDE AND REGIONAL INITIATIVES;
(B) COLLABORATE WITH STATE, FEDERAL, AND LOCAL GOVERNMENT
PARTNERS; TRIBAL GOVERNMENTS; AND INTERESTED STAKEHOLDERS,
INCLUDING LOCAL COMMUNITIES, PRIVATE LANDOWNERS, RECREATION AND
RECREATION PROVIDER STAKEHOLDERS, CONSERVATION STAKEHOLDERS,
AGRICULTURAL STAKEHOLDERS, AND WILDLIFE AND SPORTSPERSON
STAKEHOLDERS;
(C) ESTABLISH PROCESSES WITH STATE GOVERNMENT ENTITIES AND
ASSOCIATED PARTNERS, SUCH AS THE OUTDOOR RECREATION INDUSTRY
OFFICE AND THE GREAT OUTDOORS COLORADO PROGRAM, TO IMPROVE
COORDINATION AND EFFICIENCY ACROSS AGENCY PARTNERS;
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1008

(D) APPLY PROACTIVE AND ADAPTIVE APPROACHES TO THE
DEVELOPMENT OF EXCEPTIONAL AND SUSTAINABLE OUTDOOR RECREATION
OPPORTUNITIES TO SUPPORT LONG-TERM RESOURCE VIABILITY;
(E) IDENTIFY AREAS OF ALIGNMENT AND POTENTIAL CONFLICT
AMONG RECREATION, WILDLIFE, CONSERVATION, AGRICULTURAL, AND
COMMUNITY PRIORITIES AND CHARACTER AND FACILITATE COLLABORATIVE
PROBLEM-SOLVING PROCESSES WITH RELEVANT PARTNERS TO SUPPORT
MUTUALLY BENEFICIAL OUTCOMES;
(F) ENGAGE LOCAL GOVERNMENTS IN THE DEVELOPMENT OF
REGIONAL PRIORITIES AND ASSOCIATED PLANNING EFFORTS AND PROJECTS
WITHIN THEIR JURISDICTION AND GIVE APPROPRIATE CONSIDERATION TO
LOCAL GOVERNMENT PRIORITIES AND REGIONAL PLANNING EFFORTS TO
ENSURE A COOPERATIVE AND COMPLEMENTARY APPROACH TO OUTDOOR
RECREATION PLANNING AND MANAGEMENT;
(G) EMPLOY DATA-INFORMED MANAGEMENT STRATEGIES FOR
PLANNING AND INVESTMENT IN PUBLIC LANDS AND REGIONAL OUTDOOR
RECREATION RESOURCES TO SUPPORT SHARED UNDERSTANDING AND
INFORMED DECISION-MAKING AMONG PARTNERS;
(H) INCORPORATE CLIMATE-RESILIENCE STRATEGIES FOR REGIONAL
OUTDOOR RECREATION AND CONSERVATION PLANNING TO ADVANCE THE
RESILIENCE AND ADAPTABILITY OF THE STATE'S NATURAL AND COMMUNITY
ASSETS;
(I) COORDINATE ACROSS THE DIVISION TO ENSURE THE BEST
AVAILABLE INFORMATION, INPUT, AND COLLABORATION. IN PARTICULAR,
THE DIVISION SHALL ENSURE COORDINATION BETWEEN WILDLIFE,
RECREATION, AND CLIMATE-RESILIENCE EFFORTS WITHIN THE DIVISION.
(J) CONSIDER AVAILABLE FUNDING SOURCES TO ENABLE STRATEGIC
INVESTMENTS TO ADVANCE CONSERVATION, RECREATION, AND
CLIMATE-RESILIENCE EFFORTS WITHIN THE DIVISION.
(II) THE DIVISION SHALL:
(A) REFER TO THE PLANNING REPORTS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION
(6)(b)(I) OF THIS SECTION TO INFORM DIVISION PLANNING, INVESTMENT, AND
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1008

MANAGEMENT ACTIVITIES AND OUTREACH TO EXTERNAL STAKEHOLDERS,
INCLUDING LOCAL GOVERNMENTS; AND
(B) UPDATE THE PLANNING REPORTS AT LEAST ANNUALLY TO
REFLECT THE LATEST KNOWLEDGE AND ANY ASSOCIATED PLANNING
UPDATES AND FACILITATE IMPROVED AWARENESS AND COORDINATION
WITHIN THE DIVISION AND AMONG THE DIVISION AND OTHER AGENCIES.
(7) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION:
(a) REQUIRES ACTION OR PARTICIPATION FROM A PRIVATE OR
NON-STATE-GOVERNMENT ENTITY;
(b) GRANTS THE DIVISION DECISION-MAKING AUTHORITY OVER
MATTERS THAT ARE WITHIN ANOTHER ENTITY'S JURISDICTION;
(c) ALTERS OR DIMINISHES THE DIVISION'S EXISTING STATUTORY
RESPONSIBILITIES TO PERPETUATE THE WILDLIFE RESOURCES OF THE STATE
AND TO MANAGE AND IMPROVE THE STATE PARKS SYSTEM. THE AUTHORITY
SET FORTH IN THIS SECTION COMPLEMENTS THE DIVISION'S MISSION AND
EXISTING OBLIGATIONS.
(d) SUPERSEDES, ABROGATES, OR IMPAIRS THE RIGHT TO DIVERT
WATER AND APPLY WATER TO BENEFICIAL USES IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SECTION 6 OF ARTICLE XVI OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION, COMPACTS
ENTERED INTO BY THE STATE, ARTICLES 80 TO 92 OF TITLE 37, OR STATE
COURT DETERMINATIONS WITH RESPECT TO THE DETERMINATION AND
ADMINISTRATION OF WATER RIGHTS. A PERSON SHALL NOT CONSTRUE,
ENFORCE, OR APPLY THIS SECTION TO CAUSE OR RESULT IN MATERIAL INJURY
TO WATER RIGHTS.
(e) REQUIRES, MANDATES, OR OTHERWISE COMPELS A PUBLIC OR
PRIVATE LANDOWNER TO PROVIDE ACCESS TO LAND FOR RECREATIONAL
PURPOSES OR ALTERS EXISTING STATE LAWS GOVERNING PROPERTY RIGHTS,
EASEMENTS, OR LANDOWNER LIABILITY.
(8) IN 2027 AND 2028, THE DIVISION SHALL INCLUDE, DURING ITS
"SMART ACT" HEARING REQUIRED BY SECTION 2-7-203, AN UPDATE ON THE
EFFORTS DESCRIBED IN THIS SECTION, INCLUDING A DESCRIPTION OF THE
PLANNING REPORTS REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (6)(b)(I) OF THIS SECTION
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 26-1008

AND THE MONEY THAT THE DIVISION UTILIZED TO COMPLY WITH THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 5. Appropriation. (1) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year,
$436,025 is appropriated to the department of natural resources for use by
the division of parks and wildlife. This appropriation is from the parks and
outdoor recreation cash fund created in section 33-10-111 (1), C.R.S., and
is based on an assumption that the division will require an additional 4.1
FTE. To implement this act, the division may use this appropriation for state
park operations.
SECTION 6. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 14-HOUSE BILL 26-1008

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 15-HOUSE BILL 26-1008